Maryland, session 2026, SB0523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
5–205.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 523 3
(2) “AGRICULTURAL ACTIVITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
5–901 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “FORESTRY ACTIVITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–901 OF
THIS TITLE.
(4) “NONTIDAL WETLAND” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–901 OF
THIS TITLE.
(5) “OBLIGATE SPECIES” MEANS AN ANIMAL SPECIES THAT DEPENDS
ON VERNAL POOLS AS A NECESSARY PART OF ITS LIFE CYCLE.
(6) “QUALIFIED VERNAL POOL” MEANS A CONFINED DEPRESSION
THAT:
(I) HAS SURFACE WATER FOR PART OF THE YEAR;
(II) PROVIDES A PERSISTENT OR BREEDING HABITAT FOR
OBLIGATE SPECIES, INCLUDING NATIVE AMPHIBIANS AND INVERTEBRATES; AND
(III) DOES NOT MEET THE CRITERIA FOR PROTECTION AS A
NONTIDAL WETLAND UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, INCLUDING THE FEDERAL
WETLAND DELINEATION CRITERIA OF HYDROLOGY, HYDRIC SOILS, AND
HYDROPHYTIC VEGETATION.
(7) (I) “REGULATED ACTIVITY” MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
ACTIVITIES IN A QUALIFIED VERNAL POOL OR WITHIN A BUFFER AROUND A
QUALIFIED VERNAL POOL:
1. THE REMOVAL, EXCAVATION, OR DREDGING OF SOIL,
SAND, GRAVEL, MINERALS, ORGANIC MATTER, OR MATERIALS OF ANY KIND;
2. THE CHANGING OF EXISTING DRAINAGE
CHARACTERISTICS, SEDIMENTATION PATTERNS, FLOW PATTERNS, OR FLOOD
RETENTION CHARACTERISTICS;
3. THE DISTURBANCE OF THE WATER LEVEL OR WATER
TABLE BY DRAINAGE, IMPOUNDMENT, OR OTHER MEANS;
4. THE DUMPING, DISCHARGING OF MATERIAL, OR
FILLING WITH MATERIAL, INCLUDING THE DRIVING OF PILES AND PLACING OF
OBSTRUCTIONS;

SENATE BILL 523
5. THE GRADING OR REMOVAL OF MATERIAL THAT
WOULD ALTER EXISTING TOPOGRAPHY; AND
6. THE DESTRUCTION OR REMOVAL OF PLANT LIFE
THAT WOULD ALTER THE CHARACTER OF A QUALIFIED VERNAL POOL.
(II) “REGULATED ACTIVITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
AGRICULTURAL ACTIVITY OR FORESTRY ACTIVITY AS DEFINED IN THIS SECTION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(1) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS
IN THE STATE;
(2) ESTABLISH PROTECTIONS RELATED TO THE PRESERVATION OF
QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS IN THE STATE;
(3) ESTABLISH PROTECTIONS FOR BUFFERS AROUND QUALIFIED
VERNAL POOLS IN THE STATE; AND
(4) REQUIRE THAT A PERSON CONDUCTING A REGULATED ACTIVITY
RESULTING IN IMPAIRMENTS OR LOSSES TO A QUALIFIED VERNAL POOL OR A
BUFFER AROUND A QUALIFIED VERNAL POOL:
(I) AVOID IMPAIRMENTS AND LOSSES TO THE MAXIMUM
EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(II) MINIMIZE IMPAIRMENTS AND LOSSES TO THE MAXIMUM
EXTENT PRACTICABLE WHERE AVOIDANCE IS NOT POSSIBLE; AND
(III) PROVIDE COMPENSATION OR OTHER MITIGATION AS
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR ANY REMAINING UNAVOIDABLE
IMPAIRMENTS AND LOSSES.
(C) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL APPLY ONLY TO QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS THAT HAVE BEEN IDENTIFIED OR
DOCUMENTED BY:
(1) THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) A PERSON USING IDENTIFICATION METHODS APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING MAPPING OR OTHER SCIENTIFIC INFORMATION; OR

SENATE BILL 523 5
(3) A CERTIFIED WETLAND DELINEATOR DURING A SITE ASSESSMENT
CONDUCTED BEFORE THE ISSUANCE OF A PERMIT FOR A REGULATED ACTIVITY.
(D) (1) IN DEVELOPING THE REGULATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE:
(I) ENSURE THAT THE BUFFER SPECIFICATIONS FOR
QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS BE CONSISTENT WITH THE BUFFER SPECIFICATIONS FOR
NONTIDAL WETLANDS UNDER § 5–906 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(II) ENSURE THAT THE COMPENSATION AND MITIGATION
REQUIREMENTS FOR IMPAIRMENTS AND LOSSES WITHIN QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS
BE CONSISTENT WITH THE COMPENSATION AND MITIGATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
IMPAIRMENTS AND LOSSES WITHIN NONTIDAL WETLANDS UNDER §§ 5–909 AND
5–910 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) USE MAPPING OR OTHER SCIENTIFIC INFORMATION TO
IDENTIFY ADDITIONAL QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS FOR INCLUSION ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S LIST OF QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS; AND
(II) CONSULT WITH ANY STAKEHOLDER GROUP AS
APPROPRIATE, INCLUDING THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND THE
UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND.
(E) IN ISSUING A PERMIT FOR A REGULATED ACTIVITY, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL PROVIDE PROTECTIONS FOR ANY QUALIFIED VERNAL POOLS THAT ARE:
(1) LISTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) LOCATED WITHIN THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA COVERED BY THE
PERMIT.
5–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Agricultural activity” means aquaculture and farming activities.
(2) “Agricultural activity” includes:

SENATE BILL 523
(i) Plowing, tillage, cropping, seeding, cultivating, and harvesting
for the production of food and fiber products; and
(ii) The grazing of livestock.
(f) “Forestry activity” means planting, cultivating, thinning, harvesting, or any
other activity undertaken to use forest resources or to improve their quality or productivity.
(m) (1) “Nontidal wetland” means an area that is inundated or saturated by
surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that
under normal circumstances does support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for
life in saturated soil conditions, commonly known as hydrophytic vegetation.
(2) The determination of whether an area is a nontidal wetland shall be
made in accordance with the publication known as the “Federal Manual for Identifying and
Delineating Jurisdictional Wetlands”, published in 1989 and as may be amended.
(3) “Nontidal wetlands” do not include tidal wetlands regulated under Title
16 of this article.
Article – Natural Resources
1–1002.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FACULTATIVE SPECIES” MEANS AN ANIMAL SPECIES THAT USES
VERNAL POOLS IRREGULARLY.
(3) “OBLIGATE SPECIES” MEANS AN ANIMAL SPECIES THAT DEPENDS
ON VERNAL POOLS AS A NECESSARY PART OF ITS LIFE CYCLE.
(4) “TYPICAL YEAR” MEANS A YEAR IN WHICH RAINFALL TOTALS
MEET OR EXCEED THE AVERAGE YEARLY RAINFALL FROM THE PREVIOUS 30 YEARS
FOR THE LOCATION WITHIN WHICH THE VERNAL POOL IS LOCATED.
(5) “VERNAL POOL” MEANS A CONFINED DEPRESSION THAT:
(I) HAS SURFACE WATER FOR AT LEAST 2 CONSECUTIVE
MONTHS BETWEEN NOVEMBER AND MAY IN A TYPICAL YEAR;
(II) EXPERIENCES A DECREASE IN WATER LEVEL TO 6 INCHES
OR LESS BETWEEN JUNE AND SEPTEMBER IN A TYPICAL YEAR;

SENATE BILL 523 7
(III) PROVIDES A PERSISTENT OR BREEDING HABITAT FOR
VARIOUS ANIMAL SPECIES, INCLUDING NATIVE AMPHIBIANS AND INVERTEBRATES
THAT ARE FACULTATIVE SPECIES OR OBLIGATE SPECIES;
(IV) CONTAINS LESS THAN 30% AERIAL COVER OF EMERGENT
VEGETATION WHEN FULL;
(V) IS PREDOMINANTLY OR PARTIALLY SHADED BY WOODY
VEGETATION;
(VI) IS LESS THAN 5 ACRES IN SIZE; AND
(VII) MAY HAVE INTERMITTENT, TEMPORARY CONNECTIONS TO
OTHER BODIES OF WATER.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT, CREATE AND MAINTAIN A LIST OF VERNAL POOLS IN THE STATE;
(2) ESTABLISH CRITERIA AND PROCEDURES FOR IDENTIFYING AND
INCLUDING VERNAL POOLS ON THE LIST, INCLUDING:
(I) VERNAL POOLS IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
CARRYING OUT ITS DUTIES SET FORTH IN THIS ARTICLE;
(II) LOCATIONS THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES MEET THE
DEFINITION OF A VERNAL POOL UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) VERNAL POOLS IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(3) AUTHORIZE:
(I) USING MAPPING OR OTHER SCIENTIFIC INFORMATION TO
IDENTIFY ADDITIONAL VERNAL POOLS FOR INCLUSION ON THE LIST; AND
(II) CONSULTING WITH ANY STAKEHOLDER GROUP AS
APPROPRIATE, INCLUDING THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE
UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, TO IDENTIFY VERNAL POOLS FOR INCLUSION ON THE
LIST; AND
(4) PROVIDE FOR PUBLICATION OF THE LIST OF VERNAL POOLS ON
THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.

SENATE BILL 523
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL DESIGNATE
STAFF TO RECEIVE TRAINING IN VERNAL POOL IDENTIFICATION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE VERNAL POOL
IDENTIFICATION TRAINING TO THE STAFF DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) IF, IN CARRYING OUT RESPONSIBILITIES UNDER TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 9 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, STAFF TRAINED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IDENTIFY A LOCATION THAT MAY QUALIFY AS A VERNAL POOL, THE
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
LOCATION FOR POSSIBLE INCLUSION ON THE LIST ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
AUTHORITY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT TO REGULATE VERNAL
POOLS THAT MEET THE DEFINITION OF NONTIDAL WETLANDS UNDER TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 9 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.